Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-6911
Declaration; confidentiality.

A declaration under
sections 71-6901 to 71-6911 shall be confidential except as would be required
in any court proceedings under such sections.

Laws 2011, LB690, § 15.